Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-337
State park system; purpose.

The intent and purpose of sections 37-337 to 37-348 is to provide for the development and administration of a balanced state park system and to provide nonurban park areas for the inspiration, recreation, and enjoyment primarily of resident populations.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 1, p. 1464;

Laws 1983, LB 610, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.21;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 95.